"8/2/1989--Passed Senate amended. National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Years 1990 and 1991 - \n    Division\n    A\n     - \n    National Defense Authorizations\n    \n    Title\n    I\n     - \n    Procurement\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Funding Authorizations\n    Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 to the Army, Navy and Marine Corps, and Air Force for: (1) aircraft; (2) missiles; (3) weapons and tracked combat vehicles; (4) ammunition; (5) shipbuilding and conversion; and (6) other procurement. Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for: (1) procurement for the defense agencies and the reserves; and (2) the chemical demilitarization program. Specifies programs for which the Secretary of the military department concerned may and may not use funds appropriated for FY 1990 and 1991 to enter into multiyear procurement contracts for specified defense procurement programs. Amends the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Years 1988 and 1989 to reduce or increase various defense procurement program authorizations under such Act. Authorizes additional appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for the armed forces for missile procurement.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Program Requirements, Restrictions, and Limitations\n    Places funding restrictions or limitations on the following programs: (1) the M-1 tank; (2) ten-ton trucks; and (3) procurement of V-22 aircraft.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Strategic Program Test and Reporting Requirements\n    Prohibits any funding reductions to be made during FY 1990 in the Trident II missile program to achieve any undistributed reduction required for Department of Defense programs. Directs the Secretary of Defense, during FY 1990 and 1991, to develop a program and plan for a defense avionics test and evaluation program in connection with the proposed modifications of the B-1B aircraft. Requires the Secretary to report to the Senate and House Armed Services Committees (the defense committees) concerning such plan. Outlines provisions relating to the availability of funds for modifications to such aircraft and requirements for bimonthly status reports on such aircraft, and an independent assessment of the capabilities of such aircraft by a panel of experts appointed by the Secretary. Earmarks specified FY 1990 Air Force procurement funds for the B-2 bomber program. Outlines certain flight test and other requirements to be satisfied before such funding is authorized for the B-2 bomber program, including an assessment of such aircraft by the Low-Observables Panel of the Defense Science Board. Requires the Secretary to certify annually to the Congress that the cost of such bomber program does not exceed specified amounts. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees concerning the correction of deficiencies clauses in B-2 aircraft procurement contracts. Requires the Secretary of the Air Force to take necessary action to ensure that procurement for the B-2 aircraft authorized for FY 1989 and 1990 is subject to a contractor guarantee under current Federal armed forces procurement provisions. Outlines other provisions concerning the prime contractor's assumption of greater liability responsibility for the cost of corrective actions under B-2 procurement contracts. Requires the Secretary to notify the defense committees concerning such contractor liability and corrective action taken. Directs the Secretary of Defense to conduct a comprehensive study of alternative plans for the production of B-2 aircraft. Directs the Secretary to report the results of such study to the defense committees. Sets forth certain testing and certification requirements to be satisfied before funding will be authorized in FY 1990 for the procurement of advanced cruise missiles.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Program Terminations\n    Terminates the following programs, with specified exceptions: (1) the F-14 aircraft, after FY 1989; (2) the AH-64 helicopter, after FY 1991; (3) the AHIP Scout helicopter, after FY 1989; (4) the F-15E aircraft, after October 1, 1991; and (5) the M88A2 recovery vehicle, after FY 1989.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Miscellaneous Provisions\n    Repeals the procurement requirement and limitation of funds for the Heavy Expanded Mobility Tactical Truck. Requires the Secretary of the Navy to report to specified congressional committees on current and projected Navy aircraft requirements. Revises current Federal armed forces provisions to authorize the Secretary of the Air Force to enter into contracts with U.S. citizens which allow such citizens to include or incorporate in their aircraft defense features which will ensure the interoperability of such aircraft with the Department of Defense (DOD) airlift system. Outlines contract terms and conditions.  \n    Title\n    II\n     - \n    Research, Development, Test, and Evaluation\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Authorizations and Funding for Specific Programs\n    Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for research, development, test, and evaluation (R&amp;D funds) for the armed forces and the defense agencies. Authorizes additional appropriations to the Army and Marine Corps for research and development for improved infantry weapons and equipment.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Program Requirements, Restrictions, and Limitations\n    Earmarks specified R&amp;D funds for research and development under the Balanced Technology Initiative program. Outlines administrative provisions concerning such funds. Requires the Secretary to report to certain congressional committees specified information concerning the Initiative. Authorizes the Secretary, in carrying out advanced research projects through the Defense Advanced Research Project Agency, to enter into cooperative agreements and other transactions with any Federal, State, local, educational, or other entity. Requires the Secretary to report annually to the defense committees on any such agreements entered into during the prior fiscal year. Provides FY 1990 and 1991 funding for such cooperative agreements program. Authorizes the Secretary to use procedures other than competitive procedures in awarding grants to colleges and universities for the conduct of research and development. Requires the Secretary to report semiannually to the defense committees on the use of competitive procedures for R&amp;D contracts with colleges and universities. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to establish an integrated electric drive system for the DDG-51 guided missile destroyer program. Earmarks R&amp;D funds for such program. Earmarks specified funds for the fast sealift technology development program. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to establish such program. Earmarks specified funds for the tactical oceanography program. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to establish such program. Prohibits FY 1991 R&amp;D funds from being used for Navy ship design. Earmarks specified R&amp;D funds for: (1) biodegradable materials research; and (2) the chemical weapons monitoring program. Increases by six months the time in which the Secretary of Defense must select a heavy truck system configured with a palletized loading system. Requires the Secretary of a military department or defense agency head, in awarding R&amp;D contracts in connection with laser weapon verification technology, to ensure that such contractors have laser research experience in specified areas of expertise. Earmarks specified R&amp;D funds for a joint Army-Department of Energy research project on magnetoencephalography and neuromagnetism.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Strategic Defense Initiative\n    Earmarks specified R&amp;D funds for the Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI). Specifies an amount to be used solely in connection with the construction of the National Test Bed project. Requires the Secretary to report to certain congressional committees on the allocation of funds appropriated for SDI for FY 1990. Requires the Secretary to submit annual reports to the Congress on the programs and projects that constitute SDI and on any other program or project relating to defense against ballistic missiles. Places specified limitations on the development and testing of anti-ballistic missile systems or components. Earmarks specified FY 1990 and 1991 R&amp;D funds for support of the medical free electron laser program. Directs the Secretary, in coordination with the Central Intelligence Agency, to report to the Congress on the asymmetry in U.S. and Soviet near-term capabilities to deploy anti-ballistic missile defenses beyond those permitted under the 1972 ABM Treaty.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Strategic Programs\n    Prohibits FY 1990 DOD funding reductions in the Trident II missile program in order to achieve any undistributed reduction required for Department of Defense programs. Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to transfer specified R&amp;D funds to fund priority security improvements at the Kwajalein Test Range, on Kwajalein Island. Amends the Goldwater-Nichols Department of Defense Reorganization Act of 1986 to restore certain reporting requirements under such Act relating to chemical and biological warfare agents.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Allied Cooperative Research and Development\n    Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to enter into a memorandum of understanding (or other formal agreement) with one or more major allies of the United States for the purpose of conducting cooperative research and development projects on defense equipment and munitions. Outlines certain restrictions to be followed by the Secretary under such program. Directs the Under Secretary of Defense for Acquisition to prepare a formal arms cooperation opportunities document for review by the Defense Acquisition Board at its formal meetings. Requires the Under Secretary to report to certain congressional committees describing the purpose, status, funding, and schedules of cooperative agreements carried out under this provision. Requires the Secretary of Defense and the Secretary of State, whenever they consider it necessary, to report to certain committees enumerating those countries to be added to or deleted from the list designated as major non-NATO allies for purposes of this section. Expresses the sense of the Congress that DOD should perform more side-by-side testing of conventional defense equipment manufactured by the United States and other member nations of NATO. Authorizes the Deputy Director of Defense Research and Engineering to acquire specified items for such side-by-side testing. Requires the Deputy Director to report to certain congressional committees concerning funding and systems and munitions evaluated under such side-by-side testing program. Repeals specified inconsistent provisions of prior defense authorization acts.  \n    Title\n    III\n     - \n    Operation and Maintenance\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Authorization of Appropriations\n    Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for operation and maintenance for the Army, the Navy, the Marine Corps, the Air Force, the defense agencies, the reserves, the National Guard, the National Board for the Promotion of Rifle Practice, the Court of Military Appeals, environmental restoration, the Goodwill Games (FY 1990 only), and for humanitarian assistance. Authorizes appropriations for unbudgeted increases in fuel costs and unbudgeted increases as the result of inflation. Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for working capital funds for the armed forces and the defense agencies. Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991 for the Department of Defense Base Closure Account. States as the purpose of the humanitarian assistance program to provide transportation and humanitarian relief for persons displaced or made refugees by the invasion of Afghanistan by the Soviet Union. Authorizes the Secretary to transfer funds to the Secretary of State for the purpose of providing such assistance. Requires transportation for such assistance, requiring the most economical means possible, to be under the direction of the Secretary of State. Requires reports concerning the provision of such assistance. Repeals prior reporting requirements.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Limitations\n    Repeals a provision of the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Years 1988 and 1989 which limits the use of operation and maintenance funds for the purchase of investment items. Prohibits the Secretary of the Navy from entering into a contract which would provide or permit joint use of the Marine Corps Aid Station, El Toro, California, with civil aviation.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Base Closure and Realignment Matters\n    Requires the Comptroller General to report to the Secretary and the defense committees on the methodology, findings, and recommendations of the Commission on Base Realignment and Closure. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees on environmental contamination at the Jefferson Providing Ground, Indiana, resulting from activities of DOD. Requires the Secretary, in every year in which military installation closure or realignment activities are carried out, to provide notice to each State and local education agencies which will experience a certain degree of enrollment changes of military dependents due to such closures or realignments.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Miscellaneous Reporting Requirements\n    Sets forth reporting requirements concerning: (1) military utilization of the inland navigation system; (2) long-range environmental challenges and goals of DOD; (3) the readiness of the armed forces in terms of manpower, mobility, sustainability, and equipment; and (4) the feasibility of restoring to the Secretary responsibility for the administration of impact aid for schools affected by DOD activities; and (5) a timetable for second source production for carbonizable rayon yarn for use on reentry vehicle heat shields and rocket nozzles. Directs the Army Corps of Engineers to conduct as promptly as possible, and continue to inform interested parties concerning, its investigation of soil and water contamination at the former Nebraska Ordnance Plant near Mead, Nebraska.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Miscellaneous Provisions\n    Revises a provision of the National Defense Authorization Act, Fiscal Year 1989 concerning authorized uses of first-year energy cost savings from incentives implemented by DOD. Requires the amount of such energy cost savings to be determined by the Secretary of the military department concerned at the end of each of the first five years (currently, only at the end of the first year). Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to purchase a railroad structure and temporary right-of-way for rail line in Nevada for use in connection with the operation of Hawthorne Army Ammunition Plant, Nevada. Requires the Secretary of Defense to formulate and carry out a program to reduce the unnecessary release of chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs) and halons and testing practices of DOD. Outlines report requirements in connection with such program. Requires the Secretary to appoint a CFC Advisory Committee to study the use of CFCs by DOD and by contractors in the performance of contracts for DOD and the cost and feasibility of using alternative compounds and technologies in lieu of CFCs. Outlines reporting requirements. Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to enter into a long-term lease for the provision of air transportation at Kwajalein Atoll, Republic of the Marshall Islands, under specified conditions. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to enter into a service contract for the training of undergraduate naval flight officers during FY 1992. Directs the Secretary of Defense to increase, as of the end of FY 1990, the number of full-time personnel employed by the Defense Contract Audit Agency. Directs the Secretary of the Army, acting through the Chief of Engineers, to conduct a study determining the damage and environmental impact on the Shenandoah River caused by companies under contract with DOD and NASA. Directs the Secretary of the Navy to make certain acquisition regulation determinations with respect to tug and towing services at Port Canaveral, Florida.  \n    Title\n    IV\n     - \n    Military Personnel Authorizations For Fiscal Years 1990 and 1991\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Active Forces\n    Authorizes end strengths for active-duty forces for FY 1990 and 1991. Prohibits the Secretary from reducing the number of active Army ground combat brigades assigned to the 4th Infantry   \n    Division\n    (Mechanized) before December 1, 1990. Allows Army end strengths to be increased in order to maintain such prohibition. Reduces, temporarily, the number of colonels authorized for active duty for FY 1991. Expresses the sense of the Congress that certain combat units stationed at Fort Knox, Kentucky, should not be permanently reassigned to Fort Irwin, California. Part B\n     - \n    Reserve Forces\n    Authorizes end strengths for reserve components of the armed forces for FY 1990 and 1991. Authorizes end strength reductions for the Selected Reserve components of the armed forces for each such fiscal year, as prescribed. Authorizes increases for each such fiscal year in the number of certain personnel authorized to be on active duty in support of the reserve forces. Reallocates the positions of two naval reserve officers serving in medical profession capacities. \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Military Training\n    Authorizes the average military training student loads for FY 1990 and 1991. Provides for the adjustment of such student loads consistent with manpower strengths authorized under this Act.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Civilian Personnel\n    Repeals current Federal provisions concerning management constraints for DOD civilian personnel. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to accept voluntary services from an individual for work in a natural resources program.  \n    Title\n    V\n     - \n    Military Personnel\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Matters Affecting the Reserve Components\n    Authorizes a person with no prior military service who is qualified for active-duty enlistment in the armed forces (regular) to be enlisted as a member of the reserves under a delayed entry program. Allows such person to be enlisted in a regular component of the armed forces within 365 days after enlistment in the reserves. Exempts members of the delayed entry program from otherwise applicable Ready Reserve training requirements. Prohibits the period of enlisted service under the delayed entry program form being counted as part of the years of service for the computation of the basic pay of a member. Authorizes the Secretary to order a member of the Ready Reserve to muster duty one time each year without his consent. Authorize a member of the Ready Reserve who is not a member of the National Guard or of the Selected Reserve to be entitled to an allowance for such muster duty if engaged in such duty for at least two hours. Repeals a provision of Federal law which allows a uniform and equipment reimbursement monthly for a reserve officer of the armed forces who has not become entitled to a uniform reimbursement or allowance as an officer for the preceding four years. Extends through FY 1992 certain expiring authorities relating to the reserves. Authorizes the payment of special pay for an enlisted member who is assigned to a high priority unit of the Selected Reserve and who performs inactive duty for training with such unit. Terminates such special assignment pay after FY 1991. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees on the administration of such special pay program.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Health Care Matters\n    Prohibits the Secretary, during FY 1990 and 1991, from charging for the receipt of outpatient medical or dental care at a military treatment facility. Revises a provision concerning the limitation on payments made to noninstitutional health-care providers from the Secretary concerned under the Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS). Authorizes the Secretary to increase the maximum amount of such payments whenever the Secretary of Health and Human Services increases the amount payable to providers of services under part B of title XVIII (Medicare) of the Social Security Act. Authorizes the Secretary to require a private health-care provider which is also a health-care provider under CHAMPUS to provide such care under the same rules applicable under such program. Authorizes the provision of specialized training as another benefit under the Armed Forces Health Professions Scholarship Program. Allows a person participating in such specialized training, in addition to receiving a stipend under such Program, to be paid an annual grant of $15,000. Requires a pro rata refund of such grant amount from a person who voluntarily terminates the Program's specialized training. Expands the type of loans qualifying for repayment by the Secretary concerned for health professionals who serve in the Selected Reserve as part of such loan repayment agreement, including any loan which was used to finance basic or advanced health professions education. Makes all members of the Ready Reserve (currently, only members of the Selected Reserve) eligible for such loan repayments and increases the yearly and total amount of such loan repayments. Repeals the current October 1, 1990, date for the termination of such loan repayments. Revises the deadline for the use of diagnosis related groups for outpatient treatment. Increases from 67 to 68 the deferment age for retirement for regular commissioned officers of the armed forces. Authorizes the retention of reserve officer psychologists in an active status in order to fulfill a mission-based requirement.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Personnel Management\n    States the conditions under which the President may vacate a promotion to the grade of major through major general and lieutenant commander through rear admiral. Directs the Secretary to reduce by the end of FY 1992 the number of nonoperational flying duty positions in the armed forces by five percent. Prohibits any increase in the number of such positions after FY 1991. Outlines the minimum service requirement for certain flight crew positions. Requires the Comptroller General to conduct a study, and report to the defense committees, on the aviator assignment policies and practices of the armed forces.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Total Force Policy\n    Directs the Secretary to convene a study group to review the operation and soundness of the Total Force Policy (the force mix in each of the military departments) of DOD and to make recommendations for the improvement of such Policy. Requires the Secretary to report the study group's results to the defense committees.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Miscellaneous\n    Increases the service obligations for graduates of: (1) the Uniformed Services University of the Health Sciences; and (2) the service academies. Revises the composition and term of members of the U.S. Court of Military Appeals. Revises provisions concerning: (1) the removal of judges from such Court; (2) incapacity of such judges; (3) service and pay of a senior judge of such Court; (4) the appointment and civil service status of legal staff of the Court; (5) the retirement of judges of the Court; and (6) appellate review procedures of action taken by the Judge Advocate General under provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice. Directs the President to prescribe procedures for the investigation and disposition of charges, allegations, and information pertaining to the fitness of a military judge or military appellate judge to perform the duties of office. Requires such procedures to be transmitted to the defense committees. Makes permanent the authority to make temporary promotions of certain Navy lieutenants. Extends through October 1, 1992, the authority for a test program for the reimbursement to members of the armed forces of qualifying adoption expenses. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to require each applicant for enlistment or appointment to undergo drug and alcohol abuse testing before becoming a member of the armed forces. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to correct the military records of promotion of enlisted members if the Secretary concerned considers such action necessary to correct an error or injustice. Provides members of the National Guard, Reserves, retired military personnel, and civilian employees of DOD with the same relief from expenses incurred because of an error in the mandatory direct deposit of pay. Provides for the awarding of the degree of Master of Arts in Leader Development. Authorizes the Secretary to provide transportation to next-of-kin of members of the armed forces who have been prisoners of war or missing in action as a result of service during the Vietnam era to attend an annual meeting of such families. Revises certain procedures regarding the solicitation and award of contracts for postsecondary education services for members of the armed forces, civilian DOD employees, or the dependents of such members and employees. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to employ civilian faculty at the United States Marine Corps University. Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to enter into contracts providing for the production and commercial sale of a certain recording made by the Cincinnati Pops Orchestra and the U.S. Air Force Singing Sergeants.  \n    Title\n    VI\n     - \n    Compensation and Other Personnel Benefits\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Pay and Allowances\n    Waives the automatic adjustment authorized for military pay consistent with yearly increases in the GS Schedule of the Federal Government, authorizing instead a 3.6 percent increase in the rates of basic pay, basic allowance for quarters, and basic allowance for subsistence. Increases cadet and midshipman pay. Makes each such increase effective as of January 1, 1990.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Incentive Pay\n    Increases the flying duties required for an aviation officer to be entitled to aviation career incentive pay. Requires the President to increase such incentive pay by the percentage of any increase in basic pay. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to delay implementation of such increased flying duty when necessary to meet the needs of his department. Extends through FY 1992 the aviator retention bonus program. Outlines certain reporting requirements under such program and limits the total obligations permitted for the Navy and Air Force during FY 1990 for the payment of such bonuses. Increases the special pay for medical officers in the armed forces. Extends through FY 1990 the medical officer retention bonus program. Terminates such authority if a certain report is not made by a specified date. Provides for the payment of special pay in the form of an accession bonus for registered nurses who agree within a specified period to accept a commission and perform duty as a registered nurse in the armed forces for not less than four years. Outlines certain limitations and conditions under such program. Provides a nurse officer candidate accession bonus for individuals who execute a written agreement to accept an appointment as a nurse officer after completion of two years of a degree program in nursing and while enrolled as a full-time student in a nursing program in an institution that does not have a Senior Reserve Officers' Training Program. Outlines agreement terms. Requires a pro rata refund of any bonus paid when an individual fails to complete either the required period of education or the required period of military service after the completion of such education. Authorizes the payment of special incentive pay for nurse anesthetists who execute a written agreement to remain on active duty for at least one year after their initial required period of duty. Outlines terms of such bonus pay. Requires refunds on a pro rata basis for agreed-upon time not successfully served. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees on the use of certified registered nurse anesthetists by the military departments. Increases: (1) the special pay for reserve medical officers; and (2) the length and amount of the Selected Reserve reenlistment bonus program. Extends certain enlistment and reenlistment bonus authorities for reserve forces. Extends the bonus authority for certain nuclear career officer bonus programs. Authorizes the payment of special pay for psychologists who are officers in the armed forces or the Public Health Service and who have been awarded a diploma by the American Board of Professional Psychology.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Travel and Transportation\n    Authorizes a travel and transportation allowance for a member of the armed forces who is assigned to permanent duty aboard a ship that is undergoing construction away from the designated home port or away from the area where the dependents of the member are residing. Outlines terms and conditions for such allowances. Authorizes reimbursement for parking fees, ferry fares, and tolls for any member of the armed forces entitled to general travel and transportation allowances. Authorizes student travel allowances for dependents of members stationed outside the continental United States. Prohibits such allowance for dependents of members permanently stationed in Alaska or Hawaii for a child attending a school in the State of the permanent duty station.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Survivor Benefit Program\n    Revises the reduction in retired pay for participants in the Survivor Benefit Plan. Differentiates, in the level premium to be paid each month by participants in the Plan, as to whether the annuity being provided is a standard or reserve-component annuity and whether the person becomes an active participant in the Plan before or after the effective date of the Military Survivor Benefit Improvement Act of 1989. Directs the Secretary of the military department concerned to carry out a program, to be known as the Supplemental Survivor Benefit Plan (SSBP), which would enable participants in the Survivor Benefit Plan (SBP) who are providing coverage for a spouse or former spouse beneficiary under the SBP to also provide a supplemental annuity for that spouse or former spouse beginning when the participant dies or when the spouse or former spouse becomes 62 years of age, whichever is later, in order to offset the effects of the two-tier annuity computation under the SBP. Outlines the following administrative provisions concerning the SSBP: (1) commencement of annuity; (2) the amount of such annuity for the beneficiary of a person providing the standard or the reserve-component annuity under the SBP (the latter annuity further defined by whether or not the beneficiary under the SSBP is initially under 62 years of age at the commencement of the annuity); and (3) adjustments in such annuities required by periodic adjustments in the cost-of-living index. Terminates a SSBP annuity when the beneficiary dies or otherwise becomes ineligible to continue to receive an annuity under the original SBP. Allows a person who provides an annuity for a spouse or former spouse under SBP to elect to provide a supplemental spouse annuity under these provisions. Requires a person providing a supplemental spouse annuity to be a participant in the SBP in order to cover a spouse or former spouse under the SSBP. Requires such election to be voluntary. Allows a person to make such an election only if the beneficiary of such person's annuity is not currently computed under the determination of spouse or former spouse beneficiary annuity under the SBP. Allows a person who anticipates becoming a participant in the SBP who has a spouse or former spouse to elect to provide a supplemental spouse annuity under the SSBP. Outlines conditions and requirements for such an anticipatory election. Requires a person to actually provide a spouse or former spouse annuity under the SBP in order to provide a supplemental spouse annuity under the SSBP. Allows a person who elects to provide SBP coverage for a former spouse after having been an SBP participant without coverage for that former spouse to also provide a supplemental spouse annuity for such former spouse under the SSBP. Requires notice to a current spouse of a person providing coverage under the SBP and the SSBP to a former spouse. Provides for irrevocability after a specified period of time of the election to provide SSBP coverage under both a standard annuity and a reserve-component annuity. Authorizes provision of a supplemental spouse annuity under the above provisions by a person who is a participant in the SBP and is providing coverage for a spouse (or spouse and child) but is not a participant in the SSBP, who does not have an eligible spouse under that Plan, and who remarries, thereby allowing such person to elect to provide such coverage for the former spouse. Requires the person to be under the SBP in order to make the election for such coverage under the SSBP. Outlines conditions for such an election. Outlines administrative guidelines to be followed: (1) when there is a change of a former spouse beneficiary under the SBP to a current spouse or child beneficiary under the SBP; and (2) upon reinstatement of an SSBP annuity after discontinuance of an SBP annuity and reinstatement of such annuity. Requires a person who elects to provide a SSBP annuity to a former spouse to provide the Secretary concerned with a written statement as to whether the election being made is pursuant to a written agreement incident to a divorce, dissolution, or annulment that has been incorporated in, or ratified or approved by, a court order. Outlines administrative provisions concerning the enforcement of such voluntary written agreements ratified by a court order. Provides a time limit for the making of such an election of one year after the date of the court order or filing involved. Directs the retired pay of a person electing to provide a supplemental spouse annuity under the above provisions to be reduced each month as required under prescribed regulations. Outlines considerations for the determination of such regulations by the Secretary of Defense. Prohibits any reduction during any month in which there is no eligible spouse or former spouse beneficiary. Requires the amount of the reduction to be adjusted whenever there is an adjustment to the reduction in retired pay for beneficiary coverage under the original SBP. Directs the President to prescribe regulations to implement the SSBP. Revises the annuity computation for the survivors of certain retirement-eligible officers who die while on active duty, making such an officer's retired pay rate the rate of pay applicable at the time of death. Defines those persons eligible for such recomputation. Authorizes an eligible retired or former member of the armed forces to participate in the SBP during an open enrollment period. Allows such person, at the same time, to also elect to participate in the SSBP. Defines as eligible a person who on the day before the first day of the open enrollment period is not a participant in the SBP and is either entitled to retired pay or would be so entitled but for the fact that such member or former member is under 60 years of age (for reserve members or former members). Allows a person who is a participant in the SBP but not at the maximum base amount while providing coverage for a dependent child but not for a spouse or former spouse to: (1) elect to participate in the SBP at a higher amount; or (2) elect to provide an annuity under the SBP for a spouse or former spouse. Authorizes current SBP participants to elect to participate in the SSBP during the open enrollment period. Outlines those persons eligible to make such an election and sets limitations on eligibility for certain SBP participants not affected by the two-tier annuity computation (a computation that differentiates in the annuity amount depending on whether the annuitant has attained the age of 65). Requires any SSBP election to be made in writing, signed by the person making the election, and received by the Secretary concerned before the end of the open enrollment period. Defines the open enrollment period as the one-year period beginning on the effective date of the Military Survivor Benefit Improvement Act of 1989. States that if a person dies before the end of a two-year period after making such an election, the election is void and the amount of reduction in retired pay taken as a result of such election shall be paid in a lump sum to the person's beneficiary under the SBP.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Miscellaneous\n    Increases the educational assistance allowance for persons in the armed forces with a critical skill or speciality. Authorizes the use of funds appropriated to DOD to pay for student meals provided by DOD overseas dependents' schools. Outlines limits to such authority. Authorizes a reduction in the rates for meals sold in military dining facilities if the Secretary concerned determines that such rate reduction is in the best interest of the United States. Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to pay a uniform allowance for any civilian DOD employee required to wear a prescribed uniform for the performance of official duties. Directs the Secretary to report to the defense committees a legislative proposal for an accidental death insurance plan for aviators serving on active duty. Expresses the sense of the Congress that the President should: (1) establish a commission to study the reasons for shortages of qualified aviators in both the armed forces and in the commercial airline industry and the means for eliminating such shortages; (2) include representatives from both the commercial airline industry and the armed forces on such commission; and (3) appoint members of such commission no later than February 15, 1990. Requires the commission to report the results of its study to the President and the Congress no later than March 1, 1991, together with recommendations.  \n    Title\n    VII\n     - \n    Department of Defense Management Matters\n    Requires the Secretary to report to the Congress regarding actions taken and to be taken by the Secretary to implement a report from the Secretary to the President entitled Defense Management. Earmarks specified funds appropriated to DOD for FY 1990 for the establishment of a fund under the management of the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff to cover specified expenses of a unified or specified combatant command in performing its various duties and functions. Amends the National Defense Authorization Act, Fiscal Year 1989 to reduce the period before termination of a limitation on the alert status of any Air National Guard unit to 30 days after a certain report on the subject is transmitted to the Congress by the Secretary (currently, 180 days after such report). Establishes the position of Comptroller of DOD at level III of the Executive Schedule. Establishes the positions of the General Counsels of the military departments and the Assistant Secretary of the Air Force for Financial Management at level IV of the Executive Schedule.  \n    Title\n    VIII\n     - \n    Acquisition Policy and Management\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Defense Industrial and Technology Base\n    Requires the Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy to establish a panel of experts in advanced technology to prepare and submit to the President a report identifying the product technologies and process technologies most essential to develop in order to assure the long-term national security and economic prosperity of the United States. Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to enter into agreements with specified entities for research and development identified in the report as essential. Requires the Secretary to submit to the defense committees a plan for developing the technologies considered by the Secretary and the Secretary of Energy to be the technologies most critical to ensure the long-term qualitative superiority of U.S. weapons systems. Directs the Under Secretary of Defense for Acquisition to report to the defense committees on actions taken toward the improvement of the defense industrial base of the United States. Requires the Under Secretary to analyze the ability of the defense industrial base to fulfill the national security needs of the United States. Requires the Secretary of Defense, in the negotiation of any memorandum of understanding between the United States and one or more foreign countries relating to research, development, or production of defense equipment, to regularly solicit comments and recommendations from the Secretary of Commerce with respect to the commercial implications of such memoranda on the international competitive position of U.S. industry. Outlines memorandum review requirements and other limitations. Requires the Secretary of Defense, in the negotiation of such memoranda relating to the reciprocal procurement of defense equipment and supplies or research and development, to make every effort to achieve an agreement with the country concerned that would limit the adverse effects that offset arrangements have on the defense industrial base of the United States.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Acquisition Policy Initiatives\n    Changes the title of senior procurement executive to senior service acquisition executive, for purposes of the defense acquisition process. Adds the concept demonstration validation stage as one of the stages to be considered for milestone authorizations within defense enterprise programs. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees a discussion of all regulatory reform actions taken or planned in DOD on the basis of experience under the defense enterprise programs. Directs the Secretary to prescribe regulations governing the acquisition of commercial products. Outlines provisions, regarding such acquisition, relating to contract and subcontract clauses, modified inspection clauses and warranties, cost and pricing data requirements, the training of contract officers in the acquisition of nondevelopmental items, and encouraging the acquisition of nondevelopmental items. Directs the Secretary to implement such regulations and contract clauses within 270 days after enactment of this Act. Directs the Secretary to prescribe a single, uniform regulation for DOD regarding dissemination of, and access to, acquisition information. Directs the Secretary to conduct a test program for the use of simplified procedures in the competitive awarding of a DOD contract for the procurement of property or services on the basis of design or technical quality factors. Outlines conditions under which the Secretary of a military department or a defense agency head may award a contract for the procurement of such services, as well as conditions under which such Secretary or agency head may award a contract for the procurement of commercial products under the test program. Outlines the length of the test program. Requires the Secretary to designate organizations within DOD that will participate in the program. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense committees on the test program. Revises Federal provisions concerning unit cost reports contained in Selected Acquisition Reports concerning defense procurement contracts as managed by program managers for major defense programs. Requires the service acquisition executive (currently, the Secretary concerned) to receive and tabulate information from such unit cost reports and Selected Acquisition Reports. Requires the Secretary concerned to take certain steps when the current program acquisition units costs have increased by more than 15 percent with regard to a major defense acquisition program. Requires notification to the Congress when such increases exceed 25 percent. Requires justification by a specified senior procurement executive for a defense procurement contract for between $10,000,000 and $50,000,000 to be awarded without the use of competitive procedures. Limits the positions to which such justification authority may be delegated. Requires the Director of Operational Test and Evaluation to ensure that a contractor does not assist in the test and evaluation of a weapons system if the contractor participated in the development, production, or testing of such weapon for any military department or defense agency unless the Director determines that sufficient steps have been taken to ensure the impartiality of the contractor in providing such assistance. Requires the Secretary to conduct a test program under which the Secretaries of the military departments and the heads of the defense agencies may enter into master agreements for the procurement of advisory and assistance services. Outlines provisions concerning the scope of the program, the contents and awarding of the master agreements, the orders for specific advisory or assistance services, publication of notice, and limitations with respect to the commencement and termination of the test program. Directs the Secretary to establish a test program under which one contracting activity in each military department and defense agency is authorized to undertake one or more demonstration projects to determine whether the negotiation and administration of small business subcontracting plans will result in simplified administration of the small business subcontracting opportunities provided for small businesses under DOD contracts. Outlines administrative provisions, including contents for small business subcontracting plans. Requires the Secretary to report to the defense and small business committees on the results of the test program. Revises provisions of the Small Business Act to waive the requirement that a contracting officer refer a determination of responsibility of a small business to the Small Business Administration when a proposed contract is of a limited amount. Requires the Secretary to ensure that the DOD quality assurance program is managed in a manner that will result in the production of the highest quality weapon systems, both at the initial acquisition stage and during repair and maintenance of fielded weapon systems. Outlines the structure of such program. Earmarks specified FY 1990 and 1991 DOD operation and maintenance funds for carrying out cooperative technical assistance agreements. Sets aside certain funds for eligible entities under such cooperative agreement program. Provides certain funding limitations with respect to such assistance in the case of programs operated within one or more service areas of the Bureau of Indian Affairs. Requires the Secretary to make certain revisions in the DOD Supplement to the Federal Acquisition Regulation with respect to certain fixed-price contracts awarded by DOD. Authorizes the Secretary and the Secretary of a military department to obtain defense procurement products from Federal Prison Industries (FPI) only under specified conditions. Prohibits any Secretary from accepting a product from FPI if its price exceeds the current market price of such product. Provides that credit in meeting certain minority subcontracting goals outlined under current Federal law shall be given to a contractor for each DOD contract that is to be performed on Indian lands or is a joint venture involving Indians or Indian lands. Defines contracts, subcontracts, and joint ventures eligible for such recognition, as well as the amount of credit to be given such contract or venture toward achieving such minority subcontracting goal. Directs the Secretary to direct the Secretary of each military department to identify, in each of FY 1990 and 1991, not less than ten construction projects that are suitable for participation in the Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program of the Small Business Administration (SBA) and to make use of certain authority provided in the Small Business Act in the award of contracts in connection with each such project. Expresses the sense of the Congress that an important consideration in DOD procurement should be whether such procurement is from a person of any country that denies adequate and effective protection of intellectual property rights or fair and equitable market access to U.S. persons that rely on intellectual property protection.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Acquisition Workforce\n    Requires, within two years after the enactment of this Act, demonstration programs using alternative compensation systems to be implemented by the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) and: (1) the head of the National Security Agency, Central Intelligence Agency, Defense Intelligence Agency, Federal Bureau of Investigation, or General Accounting Office; (2) the Secretary of Defense; or (3) the Administrator of NASA, whichever is appropriate. Requires no less than six and no more than ten demonstration projects to be conducted using such alternative compensation systems. Outlines administrative provisions concerning the number of programs to be undertaken by each official and the number of employees to participate in each program, and action to be taken if a demonstration program involves a collective bargaining system. Requires OPM, the Secretary, and the Administrator, with respect to each demonstration project conducted, to develop and publish in the Federal Register an information gathering plan with regard to such alternative compensation system demonstrated, and to notify affected employees and the Congress at least 90 days before implementation of such system. Provides for termination of each demonstration program. Outlines conditions under which the Secretary, the Administrator, or an agency head may permanently implement an alternative personnel compensation system previously demonstrated. Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to prescribe the rates of pay for up to 500 positions designated by the Secretary as critical. Directs the Secretary to prescribe regulations to govern discussions of future employment opportunities of procurement officials of DOD (post-employment restrictions). Outlines provisions concerning: (1) authorized discussions of possible future employment opportunities with a competing contractor by a covered procurement official; and (2) the request of advice by an employee or former employee of DOD from the appropriate designated agency ethics official as to whether such employee or former employee is precluded from participating in the performance of a particular contract on behalf of a particular contractor or subcontractor. Authorizes the Secretary to waive a certain prohibition against the receipt of dual compensation for not more than 1,000 DOD employees who are in scientific, engineering, professorial, or management positions designated as critical positions by the Secretary. Expresses the sense of the Congress that the Secretary should take all necessary actions to promote and encourage, at all educational levels, an increase in the number of U.S. citizens and nationals who pursue courses of study in science, engineering, and other technical disciplines. Directs the Secretary to prescribe regulations for the award of fellowships to U.S. citizens and nationals who agree to pursue graduate degrees in science, engineering, or other fields of study designated by the Secretary to be of priority interest to DOD. Outlines fellowship award conditions. Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 and 1991.  \n    Title\n    IX\n     - \n    General Provisions\n    Authorizes the Secretary, as necessary for the national interest, to transfer amounts of authorizations made available to DOD in titles I through III between any such authorizations for that fiscal year. Limits the total amount that may be so transferred. Requires the Secretary to notify the Congress promptly of any such transfers made. Limits the total amount authorized to be appropriated for FY 1990 and 1991 for military personnel and operations and maintenance. Places certain limitations upon DOD relating to the restoration of withdrawn unobligated balances. Directs the President to report to the defense and intelligence committees on the types of measures that would be required to verify effectively the proposal for conventional arms reductions in Europe adopted by member nations of NATO in May, 1989. Commends the President's conventional arms initiatives announced on such date. Directs the President to report to the Congress on the foreign policy and military implications to NATO and the Warsaw Pact of significant reductions of conventional forces by NATO and Warsaw Pact countries to a ceiling which is the same for both sides. Directs the President to report to the defense committees on the desirability of an agreement to impose limitations on anti-satellite capabilities. Establishes a Commission on National Service to conduct a thorough study of the need for, and desirability and disadvantages of, a national service program (a program which includes both military and civilian community service). Requires the Commission to report to the President and the Congress on its findings and recommendations. Specifies information to be included in such report if the Commission recommends the establishment of a national service program. Terminates such Commission 120 days after its report is received. Extends through FY 1991 certain authority provided to the Secretary of Defense in connection with the NATO Airborne Warning and Control System (AWACS) program. Revises certain provisions relating to the authority to enter into bilateral and multilateral arrangements for the procurement of communications support and related supplies and services from U.S.-allied countries. Amends the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to: (1) extend through FY 1994 the authority to use excess defense articles for the modernization of the defense capabilities of countries situated on the southern flank of NATO; and (2) prohibit the President from providing for the attendance of foreign military personnel without charge at the U.S. Army Russian Institute in West Germany. Authorizes the payment of travel and similar expenses for travel to Canada and Mexico in connection with bilateral and regional cooperation programs. Amends the Immigration and Nationality Act to admit temporarily workers entering this country in order to perform services as part of a governmental program of cooperative research, development, or coproduction projects. Increases from $10,000 to $100,000 the amount of an admiralty claim against the United States that may be settled by the Secretary of the military department concerned without certifying such payment to the Congress. Authorizes the Secretary to procure services for the publication of the History of the Office of the Secretary of Defense through the Government Printing Office. Directs the President to conduct and report to the Congress on a study of export financing of defense articles. Prohibits the transfer of nuclear warheads or chemical munitions by DOD in exchange for supplies and services or other property the acquisition of which is prohibited by law. Directs the President to report to the Congress on the Trident missile program and the Strategic Arms Reduction Treaty (START). Outlines issues to be addressed in such report. Waives such reporting requirement if the President has signed such a treaty or other agreement with the Soviet Union for the reduction of strategic arms. Condemns the execution of American Lieutenant Colonel William R. Higgins. Urges the President to take all appropriate action to determine the identity of those responsible and bring them to justice or take appropriate retaliatory measures. Declares that: (1) the United States should make it clear to Iran's leadership that the United States will not tolerate actions supporting terrorist groups; (2) the United Nations Secretary General should ensure that Mr. Higgins or his remains are returned to the United States; and (3) the President should consult with other nations to ensure international cooperation and coordination to end terrorist attacks. Extends the date under the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Years 1988 and 1989 for the receipt of certain reports on the manpower required to control the transfer of missile technology and certain weapons. Directs the Secretary to report to the defense committees concerning the manpower required to implement export controls on certain nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons transfers. Expresses the sense of the Congress that: (1) the Secretary should direct the SDI Organization to give priority to the development of technologies and systems for protecting the United States from the accidental launch of a strategic ballistic missile against the continental United States; (2) such development should be done in compliance with the 1972 ABM Treaty; and (3) the Secretary should report to the Congress on the development of such an accidental launch protection system. Reaffirms that service in the National Guard and Reserve is in the highest traditions of military service to the country. Acknowledges the valuable contributions made by men and women in such service. Encourages such participation in the future. Supports the National Guard and Reserve as part of the total U.S. force. Directs the President to submit to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, and, in some cases, the chairmen of the Senate and House Intelligence Committees a report on Government studies of U.S. capabilities to monitor and verify a START Treaty which allows mobile ICBMs. Expresses the sense of the Senate that any agreement negotiated to achieve a reduction and limitation on strategic arms: (1) should not prevent the United States from deploying a force structure under an agreement which emphasizes survivable strategic systems; and (2) should not prohibit or limit the deployment of non-nuclear cruise missiles. Provides authority for any appropriate Government agency aircraft to fire upon an aircraft subject to seizure or examination for the illegal transportation of narcotics, after firing a warning shot and instructing such aircraft to land for inspection. Provides indemnification from liability for Government persons taking such action. Requires the Senate Judiciary Committee to hold appropriate hearings and report back to the Senate on the legislative intent of provisions concerning the forfeiture and disqualification of active and retired officers from armed forces retirement pay and on whether remedial legislation as it affects the case of Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North is warranted. Earmarks certain previously authorized but unobligated funds for carrying out during FY 1990 the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988. Directs the Comptroller General to report to the defense committees on the International Military Education and Training Program. Expresses the sense of the Senate that previous cooperation that existed between State and local law enforcement officials and Federal agencies participating in the National Narcotics Border Interdiction System should be continued and enhanced by the Director of the Office of National Drug Policy. Directs the On-Site Inspection Agency (an arms control verification agency of DOD) to establish a database of prospective personnel that could be called upon to conduct onsite inspections pursuant to any future arms control agreement. Directs the Secretary to review a report made by the Secretary of Commerce on the foreign availability of certain personal computers and report to specified congressional committees concerning such review. Calls on the President to urge the Soviet Union to reduce its reliance on nuclear reactors in Earth orbit. Directs the President to report to the Congress on the potential for interference with gamma-ray astronomy missions that could be caused by the placement in earth orbit of space nuclear reactors presently under development by the United States. Directs the President to report to the Congress on the current and planned administrative mechanisms to coordinate information within the executive branch concerning administrative and judicial actions taken as the result of fraudulent activities practiced by defense contractors. Directs the Secretary of each military department to ensure that meat and meat products sold in commissary stores, or served in DOD dining facilities, located in any member country of the European Community are produced and processed in the United States. Urges each Secretary to intensify efforts to procure all products for such commissaries and dining facilities from U.S. sources. Directs the Secretary of Defense and the Secretary of Energy to report to the defense and intelligence committees on verification procedures for the dismantling of nuclear warheads, as well as fissile material monitoring. Directs the Secretary of Defense to submit a baseline report to the defense committees on allied defense burdensharing in Europe (the ratio of the number of U.S. troops serving in European NATO countries to the number of troops of other NATO members serving in such countries). Directs the Secretary, if the U.S.-allied troop ratio for a fiscal year exceeds the ratio in the baseline report by more than one percent, to direct the President to initiate diplomatic initiatives to increase participation of NATO troops in such defense. Prohibits the obligation of DOD funds to support U.S. troops exceeding the baseline ratio by more than one percent. Authorizes the President to waive such requirements in the interest of national security, as long as the Congress is promptly notified. Expresses the sense of the Congress that: (1) Japan should assume increased responsibility for its security; (2) Japan should offset the direct costs incurred by the United States in deploying military forces for the defense of Japan; and (3) Japan should assume a more significant security role consistent with its economic status by taking specified actions, including increasing spending for its Official Development Assistance program to areas outside East Asia, completing a five-year defense plan, and purchasing military equipment from the United States. Directs the President to: (1) enter into negotiations toward an agreement whereby Japan agrees to make contributions equal to the direct cost of deploying U.S. troops for its defense; and (2) report to the Congress on the status and results of such negotiations. Directs the Secretary to conduct a study of, and report to the Congress on, options available to DOD to reduce costs associated with maintaining overseas large numbers of military dependents and dependents of civilian employees of DOD. Expresses the sense of the Congress that: (1) the United States should reassess the missions, force structure, and locations of its military forces in South Korea and East Asia; (2) South Korea should assume increased responsibility for its security; (3) South Korea should offset more of the direct costs incurred by the United States in deploying military forces there; and (4) the United States and South Korea should consult on the feasibility and desirability of partial, gradual reductions of U.S. military forces in such country. Requires reports from the President to the Congress and the defense committees concerning such subject, including a submission of a five-year plan with respect to the U.S. military presence in South Korea. Expresses the sense of the Senate that: (1) the President should seek a START treaty that would not limit the U.S. to levels of intercontinental strategic forces inferior to those of the Soviet Union; (2) the success of attaining such a treaty is dependent upon the maintenance of a vigorous research, development, and modernization program; and (3) no action should be taken that will obligate the United States to disarm, reduce, or limit its armed forces, except pursuant to the treatymaking power of the President. Expresses the sense of the Senate that: (1) it is not prudent or possible at this time to commit to the production of B-2 aircraft other than under the low-rate initial production plan; (2) the contingent authorization of funds under this Act for such production does not constitute a commitment to support the procurement of large numbers of such aircraft or to approve multiyear procurement of such aircraft; and (3) prior to commitment to rate production of such aircraft, the President and the Congress should carefully consider the feasibility and desirability of placing primary strategic air reliance on aircraft on bombers carrying cruise missiles and procuring fewer B-2 aircraft to reduce the total acquisition and life cycle cost of the B-2 program. Expresses the sense of the Senate that the Secretary and the Director of Central Intelligence shall report to the defense and intelligence committees on efforts to locate and obtain the release of American hostages in Lebanon. Expresses the sense of the Congress that the President should continue the development of the joint services V-22 Osprey program and carry out the comprehensive review of the potential military and civilian uses of such aircraft. Requires the Secretary to report to the Congress on the number of members of the armed forces who have dependents who are eligible for Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits, including information on dependents who lose their eligibility as a consequence of member reassignment to duty outside the United States.  \n    Title\n    X\n     - \n    Panama Canal Commission\n    Authorizes the Panama Canal Commission to make such expenditures, contracts, and commitments as may be necessary for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the Panama Canal for FY 1990 and 1991, with certain conditions. Requires the Commission to provide written advance notification to the defense and merchant marine and fisheries committees regarding certain rates, payments, and projects associated with the operation and maintenance of the Canal. Authorizes funds for pay increases of officers and employees of the Commission as administratively authorized.  \n    Title\n    XI\n     - \n    Drug Interdiction and Law Enforcement Support\n    Earmarks specified DOD funds for the purpose of carrying out drug interdiction and law enforcement support activities. Directs the Secretary to provide guidance to the Secretaries of the military departments and commanders of the combatant commands on force levels and support resources necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of DOD as the single lead agency for the detection and monitoring of aerial and maritime transit of illegal drugs into the United States. Provides funding to carry out such responsibilities. Directs the Secretary to integrate into an effective communications network the command, control, communications, and technical assets of the United States that are dedicated to drug interdiction in the United States. Provides funding for such integration activities. Directs the Secretary to provide to the Governor of each State which submits a plan for the use of its National Guard for drug interdiction assistance reimbursement for the expenses incurred by such State in providing such assistance. Provides funding for such reimbursement. Excludes members of the National Guard providing such services from inclusion in Federal armed forces end-strength computations. Requires the Secretary to be responsible during FY 1990 for the maintenance and repair of equipment that has been made available by DOD to other Federal agencies for its use in antidrug efforts or because of potential future utility of such equipment to DOD. Provides funding for such maintenance and repair. Requires the Secretary to ensure that adequate research and development activities of DOD are devoted to technologies concerned with the detection of illicit drugs and other dangerous and illegal substances concealed in containers. Provides funding for such specific research and development. Requires the Secretary to pay for expenses incurred by the Civil Air Patrol in conducting drug surveillance flights for the detection and monitoring of the transportation of illegal drugs into the United States. Provides funding for the payment of such expenses. Directs the Secretary, under specified conditions, to transport personnel, supplies, and equipment within the United States and from the United States to a foreign country for the purpose of providing counter-drug operation assistance by the United States or a friendly foreign country. Provides funding for such transportation. Directs the Secretary to authorize the National Guard to loan any equipment to any Federal or State law enforcement agency for use by such agency in carrying out drug enforcement activities. Requires the Secretary to maintain, repair, and restore any equipment loaned. Provides funding for the loan of such equipment. Authorizes the Secretary to transfer to Federal and State law enforcement agencies such excess personal property of DOD as the Secretary determines suitable for use by Federal and State agencies in counter-drug activities.  \n    Title\n    XII\n     - \n    Military Child Care\n    Directs the Secretary to make available specified funds appropriated by this Act for military child development centers (facilities on military installations used primarily for the provision of child care for members of the armed forces). Requires the Secretary to give priority to increasing the number of child care employees who are directly involved in providing child care and to expanding the availability of child care for such members. Directs the Secretary to report to the defense committees on the use of child care funds. Directs the Secretary to establish, and prescribe regulations to implement, a uniform training program for child care employees as a condition of employment. Outlines training requirements to be included in such regulations. Requires the Secretary to increase the compensation of child care employees so that their compensation is comparable to other employees at the same installation. Requires at least one employee at each military child development center to be a training and curriculum child care employee, with appropriate educational credentials and child care experience. Directs the Secretary to provide a preference in hiring for child care employees for military spouses, if such spouses are among those determined to be best qualified for such positions. Adds 3,700 new child development competitive service positions for FY 1990 and 1991, in addition to those authorized for FY 1989. Directs the Secretary to prescribe regulations on fees to be charged to parents for the attendance of children at military child development centers. Directs the Secretary to establish a special task force to respond in the case of allegations of widespread child abuse at a military child development center. Directs the Secretary to establish and publicize a national telephone hotline for persons to report suspected child abuse or safety violations at a military child development center or family day care home. Requires assistance from local authorities when appropriate. Directs the Secretary to prescribe or require: (1) safety regulations at military child development centers; and (2) inspections of each facility at least four times a year. Outlines remedies for violations by military child development centers of any laws or regulations. Directs the Secretary to study, and report to the Congress on, areas of interdepartmental concern in military child care. Directs the Secretary to require the establishment of parent boards and parent participation programs at each military child development center. Directs the Secretary to submit a report and plan to the Congress on demand for child care by military and civilian personnel in the armed forces over a specified five-year period. Directs the Secretary to ensure that at 15 percent of all military child development centers are accredited by an appropriate national early childhood accrediting body by January 1, 1991. Requires the Secretary to obtain an independent evaluation of the programs provided for by such child development centers. Requires the Secretary to report the results of such evaluation to the Congress, together with a plan for providing all necessary regulations required for the establishment of such centers.  \n    Division\n    B\n     - \n    Military Construction Authorizations\n    \n    Title\n    XXI (sic)\n     - \n    Army\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes the Secretary to construct or acquire military family housing units, to carry out architectural and engineering services and construction design, and to improve existing military family housing units in specified amounts at specified installations. Authorizes appropriations to the Army for fiscal years beginning after FY 1989 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title. Extends certain FY 1985-1988 military construction projects.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes appropriations to the Army for fiscal years beginning after FY 1990 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title.  \n    Title\n    XXII\n     - \n    Navy\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes the Secretary to construct or acquire military family housing units, to carry out architectural and engineering services and construction design, and to improve existing military family housing units in specified amounts at specified installations. Authorizes appropriations to the Navy for fiscal years beginning after FY 1989 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title. Extends certain prior-year military construction projects. Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1989 to increase the amount authorized under such Act for the construction of a community support center at the Marine Corps Air Station, El Toro, California. Authorizes the Secretary to use funds paid to the United States in settlement of certain litigation proceedings solely for the construction of military family housing at such Air Station.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes the Secretary to construct or acquire military family housing units in specified amounts at specified installations. Authorizes appropriations to the Navy for fiscal years beginning after FY 1990 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title.  \n    Title\n    XXIII\n     - \n    Air Force\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes the Secretary to construct or acquire military family housing units, to carry out architectural and engineering services and construction design, and to improve existing military family housing units in specified amounts at specified installations. Authorizes appropriations to the Air Force for fiscal years beginning after FY 1989 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title. Extends certain FY 1986-1988 military construction projects. Authorizes the Secretary to make a grant to the Douglas School District, South Dakota, for the construction of a school at Ellsworth Air Force Base, South Dakota.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specifed amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes appropriations to the Air Force for fiscal years beginning after FY 1990 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within the Department. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title. Amends the National Defense Authorization Act, Fiscal Year 1989 to increase the amount authorized for a military construction project at the Arnold Engineering Development Center, provided DOD validates the requirement for the Large Rocket Test Facility.  \n    Title\n    XXIV\n     - \n    Defense Agencies\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Authorizes the Secretary to construct or acquire military family housing units and to improve existing military family housing units in specified amounts at specified installations. Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1987 to extend through FY 1990 the authority of the Secretary to carry out military construction projects not otherwise authorized by law for conforming storage facilities. Authorizes appropriations to the defense agencies for fiscal years beginning after FY 1989 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within DOD. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title. Authorizes the Secretary to contract for the design and construction of military construction projects for the Portsmouth Naval Hospital, Virginia, and Nellis Air Force Base, Nevada, under certain conditions. Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1989 to increase the amount authorized for the construction of a certain medical facility at Fort Sill, Oklahoma. Extends certain FY 1987 and 1988 military construction projects.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to acquire real property and carry out military construction projects in specified amounts at specified installations and locations. Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1987 to extend through FY 1991 the authority of the Secretary to carry out military construction projects not otherwise authorized by law for conforming storage facilities. Authorizes appropriations to the defense agencies for fiscal years beginning after FY 1990 for military construction projects, unspecified minor construction projects, architectural and engineering design services, and military family housing functions within DOD. Limits the total cost of construction projects authorized by this title.  \n    Title\n    XXV\n     - \n    North Atlantic Treaty Organization Infrastructure\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to make contributions for the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) Infrastructure Program. Authorizes appropriations to the Secretary for fiscal years after 1989 for such contributions.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes the Secretary to make contributions for the NATO Infrastructure Program. Authorizes appropriations to the Secretary for fiscal years after 1990 for such contributions.  \n    Title\n    XXVI\n     - \n    Guard and Reserve Forces Facilities\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1990\n    Authorizes appropriations for fiscal years after 1989 for acquisition, architectural and engineering services, and construction of facilities for the Guard and Reserve forces in specified amounts.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Fiscal Year 1991\n    Authorizes appropriations for fiscal years after 1990 for acquisition, architectural and engineering services, and construction of facilities for the Guard and Reserve forces in specified amounts.  \n    Title\n    XXVII\n     - \n    Expiration of Authorizations\n    Terminates all authorizations contained in titles XXI through XXV of this  \n    Division\n    on October 1, 1991, or the date of enactment of an Act authorizing funds for military construction for fiscal year 1992, whichever is later, with specified exceptions. Title XXVIII\n     - \n    General Provisions\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    Military Construction Program Changes\n    Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1984 to provide that a contract assuring the occupancy of rental housing owned by DOD may: (1) provide that utilities, trash collection, snow removal, and entomological services will be furnished by the Government to the same extent that such services are provided to other occupants of government-owned housing; and (2) require that rent collection and the operation and maintenance of the housing be accomplished through the use of separate agreements or the use of Government personnel. Increases the leasing and the high-cost threshold amounts for military family housing as contained in Federal armed forces law. Adds potable waste water treatment services to the authorized uses of long-term defense facilities contracts. Extends through FY 1991 the authority of the Secretary concerned to enter into all such contracts. Waives a certain per-unit expenditure limitation for improvements to military family housing units for three units for each military department if done to make the unit suitable for habitation by a handicapped person. Place a maximum improvement-cost limitation on any such unit. Authorizes the Secretaries of the Navy and the Air Force to enter into contracts for a specified increased number of leased family housing units. Authorizes the use of such contracts through FY 1991. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to use one-step turn-key selection procedures to enter into contracts for the construction of authorized military construction projects. (Currently, the Secretaries may use such procedures only with the approval of the Secretary of Defense.) Authorizes the use of such procedures through FY 1991. Revises Federal provisions concerning the authorized cost variations for a military construction project or for the construction, improvement, or acquisition of a military family housing project. Provides that certain defense contract limitations shall not apply to the acquisition of military construction projects or family housing projects obtained through governments of NATO subsidiary bodies for elements of the armed forces deployed in Europe and adjacent waters. Increases the amount authorized to be expended for minor military construction projects not otherwise authorized by law. Authorizes the Secretary concerned to enter into a lease for a facility on or near a military installation for the provision of the following activities or services: (1) administrative office space; (2) troop housing; (3) energy production facilities; (4) potable and waste water treatment facilities; (5) hospital and medical facilities; (6) transient quarters; and (7) depot or storage facilities. Outlines lease provisions and conditions, including a congressional notice requirement. Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to transfer certain funds to the Homeowners Assistance Fund, Defense, as determined necessary to extend homeowners assistance benefits to eligible homeowners.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Land Transactions\n    Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to convey all right, title, and interest to a parcel of real property located in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, comprising the Naval and Marine Corps Reserve Center in Pittsburgh, under specified terms and conditions. Amends the Military Construction Authorization Act, 1988 and 1989 to revise provisions concerning the sale of land and replacement of facilities at the Kapalama Military Reservation, Hawaii. Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to convey all right, title, and interest of the United States to certain land near Fort Knox, Kentucky, using competitive bidding procedures. Directs the Secretary to use the proceeds from such sale for the construction of additional family housing units at Fort Knox. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to: (1) sell and convey all right, title, and interest of the United States to specified real property comprising the Public Works Center, Great Lakes, Illinois; and (2) use the proceeds from such sale to construct additional military family housing units at the Naval Air Station, Glenview, Illinois, under specified terms and conditions. Directs the Secretary of the Army to modify the reversionary interest of the United States in specified real property conveyed to the Port of Benton, Washington, to permit a donation of real property to Washington State University for the establishment of a university branch on the donated land, under specified terms and conditions. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to convey to Hudson County, New Jersey, all right, title, and interest of the United States to a portion of the Naval Reserve Center, Kearney, New Jersey, in order to provide additional motor vehicle parking facilities for such Center. Authorizes the Secretary of the Army to convey a portion of Fort Belvoir, Virginia, known as the Engineering Proving Ground to any grantee for the construction of such facilities and improvements as may be specified by the Secretary under an agreement concerning such conveyance. Requires the Secretary to submit any such agreement to the defense committees and wait 21 days before taking any action under such agreement. Directs the Secretary of the Army to convey to the State of Georgia all right, title, and interest of the United States to a parcel of real property at Fort Gillem, Georgia, for use by the State for the administration of the Georgia Department of Defense, the Georgia National Guard, and other military activities. Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to convey to the State of Hawaii all right, title, and interest of the United States to certain real property located on Hickam Air Force Base, Hawaii, under specified terms and conditions. Directs the Secretary of the Army to release to the State of Minnesota all reversionary interests of the United States over a specified parcel of land in such State known as Area J, under specified terms and conditions. Authorizes the Secretary of the Air Force to acquire a depot operations logistics facility at Tinker Air Force Base, Oklahoma, under certain terms and conditions. Requires the Secretary of the Army to report to the defense committees on the feasibility of conveying to the State of Delaware a parcel of property known as the Fort Meade Recreation Area.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Miscellaneous Provisions\n    Transfers to the Secretary of Defense jurisdiction, custody, and control of the operation and maintenance of the Pentagon office building and its related facilities with parking grounds (known as the Pentagon Reservation). Authorizes the Secretary to appoint military or civilian personnel or contract employees to perform law enforcement and security functions for the Reservation. Authorizes the Secretary to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations to ensure the safe, efficient, and secure operation of the Reservation. Provides fines and penalties for violations of such rules and regulations. Authorizes the Secretary to enter into cooperative agreements with public or private entities willing to match Federal funds or efforts to maintain and improve natural resources or to benefit natural and historic research on DOD installations. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to: (1) design and construct a multipurpose facility at Henderson Hall, Arlington, Virginia; (2) accept from the Navy Mutual Aid Association reimbursement for all costs of the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility; and (3) lease to the Association at no cost approximately one-third of the square footage of the facility to be constructed. Outlines terms and conditions to such lease. Transfers from the Secretary of Defense to the Secretary of Energy jurisdiction and control of certain real property at Sandia, New Mexico, for use by the Department of Energy in providing a location for the Center for National Security and Arms Control. Authorizes the Secretary of the Navy to reimburse specified amounts to the Lake Charles Harbor and Terminal District, Lake Charles, Louisiana, for certain costs associated with the closing of a naval homeporting base at Lake Charles. Requires the Secretary to convey to such District the land constituting the proposed Lake Charles Navy Homeport, Louisiana. Directs the Secretary of Defense to ensure that all information relating to environmental restoration activities of DOD required to be provided to the EPA and other appropriate State and local authorities is expeditiously provided. Requires the Secretary to ensure that all DOD environmental contamination plans and assessments are carried out in accordance with applicable Federal law. Directs the Administrator of EPA to submit to the Secretary and the appropriate congressional committees comments with regard to any assessment, plan, or other action taken by DOD in the areas of environmental contamination or restoration. Requires the Secretary to install systems to monitor any potential environmental contamination at any DOD facility conducting environmental restoration activities to ensure that there is no release of contamination that will pose a risk to public health. Directs the Secretary to conduct a study of the feasibility of selling or otherwise transferring to the Commonwealth of Virginia or a subdivision thereof a parcel of land from a military installation in such State suitable as a site for a medium security correctional facility for persons sentenced in Virginia courts. Requires the study results to be reported to the defense committees.  \n    Division\n    C\n     - \n    Other National Defense Authorizations\n    \n    Title\n    XXXI (sic)\n     - \n    Department of Energy National Security Programs\n    \n    Part\n    A\n     - \n    National Security Programs Authorizations\n    Authorizes appropriations to the Department of Energy (DOE) for FY 1990 for operating expenses incurred and for plant and capital equipment necessary in carrying out national security programs in the following areas: (1) weapons activities; (2) defense nuclear materials production; (3) verification and control technology; (4) nuclear materials safeguards and security technology development program; (5) security investigations; (6) new production reactors; (7) naval reactors development; and (8) capital equipment not related to construction. Places special funding limitations for DOE for FY 1990 for the following programs and projects: (1) SDI; (2) inertial confinement fusion; (3) special isotope separation; and (4) Lance Warhead follow-on.  \n    Part\n    B\n     - \n    Recurring General Provisions\n    Prohibits the use of funds appropriated pursuant to this title for: (1) the costs of a program exceeding 105 percent of the program authorization or $10,000,000 more than the amount authorized, whichever is the lesser; or (2) programs which have not been presented to, or requested of, the Congress, unless the Secretary of Energy transmits to the appropriate committees a full and complete statement of the action proposed and 30 days have elapsed since such statement was submitted. Prohibits the total funds obligated pursuant to this title from exceeding the total amount authorized to be appropriated by this title. Authorizes the Secretary of Energy to carry out any general plant project only if the maximum estimated cost of the project does not exceed $1,200,000. Requires reports to specified committees by the Secretary when the costs exceed such amount. Sets forth procedures for the approval of projects which exceed by more than 25 percent their estimated cost or authorized amount. Exempts from such procedures any projects which have an estimated cost of less than $5,000,000. Allows for the transfer of funds from specified projects to other Government agencies for the performance of work for which the funds were appropriated. Authorizes the Secretary of Defense to transfer to the Secretary of Energy specified FY 1990 DOD research and development funds for the performance of work on SDI. Authorizes the Secretary of Energy to perform advance planning and construction design services in connection with any proposed construction project if the total estimated cost for such services does not exceed $2,000,000. Authorizes the Secretary to notify specified congressional committees whenever the estimated cost of such planning and design exceeds $300,000. Requires specific authorization by law whenever such estimated costs exceed $2,000,000. Authorizes the Secretary to perform emergency construction planning and design in order to meet the needs of national defense or to protect property or human life. Makes funds appropriated for management and support activities and for general plant projects under this title available for all national security programs of DOE.  \n    Part\n    C\n     - \n    Defense Energy Technology Transfer\n    Department of Energy National Competitiveness Technology Transfer Act of 1989 - Directs the Secretary of Energy, within 180 days after enactment of this Act, to: (1) review all existing laws, regulations, guidelines, and administrative procedures associated with DOE's ability to accomplish a national competitiveness mission (the transfer of technology gained at DOE facilities to the U.S. private sector in order to establish national security and industrial base strength goals); (2) confer with representatives of U.S. industry and labor, educational institutions, and contracting parties with respect to the implementation of a national competitiveness mission; (3) advise the Congress of any existing legal obstacles interfering with DOE's ability to achieve such mission; and (4) publish a comprehensive set of policy guidelines, procedures, and supporting regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. Requires cooperative arrangements between private parties and contractor-managers of DOE research and development facilities to be reviewed, concurred in, modified, or rejected in an expeditious manner. Outlines certain national security and other principles to be followed by the Secretary in attempting to achieve the national competitiveness mission. Requires the benefits of technology transfer resulting from such mission to accrue to U.S. industry. Requires entities owned or controlled by a foreign government or entity to be separately considered in light of national security objectives. Requires the Secretary to establish an explicit policy and procedure to govern a contractor-manager's use of Government resources for the national competitiveness mission, as well as for royalties, receipts, and other income resulting from such cooperative arrangements. Requires appropriate rights to be acquired for intellectual property acquired by the contractor-manager, private parties, or their successors-in-interest to assure commercial utilization of technology developed under cooperative arrangements. Requires the Secretary and contractor-managers to continually confer concerning such cooperative arrangements to assure progress toward achieving the national competitiveness mission. Requires each contractor-manager, beginning after the inclusion in a contract of the national competitiveness mission, to identify in writing in advance of its use in a contemplated cooperative arrangement any particular inventions conceived or reduced to practice and specific technical data or computer software first produced by the contractor-manager in the performance of program missions under its contract. Authorizes the Secretary to designate special circumstance technologies or inventions the title for which shall vest in the United States in the same manner as exceptional circumstance determinations under current Federal law. Limits the authority of the Secretary to make such designations. Outlines other provisions with respect to the disposal of title to other inventions or technologies made or discovered within the course of such cooperative arrangement contracts. Requires the Secretary, with respect to specific technical data or computer software determined to have near-term commercial value and to be necessary for the commercialization of technology to be developed under cooperative arrangements, to include in such cooperative arrangement the specific intellectual property rights to such data or software. Requires, in such case, that such data or software not be disclosed by the Government to any third party, with a specified exception relating to national security or a related reason. Extends such property rights for up to six years after their discovery, after which time the Government shall have full rights to such property. Provides that the rights to any inventions conceived or first actually reduced to practice by a collaborating party in a cooperative arrangement shall be agreed to by the parties to the arrangement, subject to regulations and to the Government's license (to practice on behalf of the United States) to that invention. Provides, with respect to technical data or software first produced under such an arrangement which the Secretary determines to have near-term commercial value and to be necessary for the commercialization of technology to be developed under the arrangement, that such data or software may not be disclosed by the Government to any third party (with the same national security-related exceptions). Extends such property rights for up to six years after discovery, after which time the Government shall have full rights to such data or software. Provides oversight of this part's provisions by the Secretary, the Inspector General of DOE, and the Comptroller General. Exempts the United States and the contractor managers from liability for injury or damage due to a defect in a product or process produced or a service performed by a collaborating party or its licensees or assigns that embodies technology developed under a cooperative arrangement under this part.  \n    Part\n    D\n     - \n    Miscellaneous Provisions\n    Amends the Department of Defense Authorization Act, 1985 to require the Secretaries of Energy and Defense to jointly report to the Congress concerning the production of the 155-millimeter artillery-fired automatic projectile. Authorizes the Secretary of Energy to designate not more than 25 positions in DOE as critical positions. Terminates such designation authority three years after enactment of this Act. Outlines provisions concerning the rates of pay for positions designated as critical. Authorizes the Secretary to designate not more than 250 positions in DOE as special scientific, engineering, and managerial positions. Amends the National Defense Authorization Act, 1986 to provide equal participation of the Secretary of Defense with the Secretary in the nuclear test ban readiness program outlined under such Act. Directs the Secretary of Energy to make necessary payments, and earmarks funds, for a Rocky Flats, Colorado, decontamination and cleanup agreement entered into between DOE and the State of Colorado. Requires the Secretary of Energy, not later than 120 days before a DOE defense nuclear facility ceases all production and processing operations, to report to the defense committees on the training and job placement services needed to enable former employees of such facility to obtain employment in the environmental remediation and cleanup activities at such facility. Requires DOE, upon cessation of productive operations, to report to the Congress on environmental problems at the facility, cleanup costs, and the proposed cleanup schedule. Amends the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 to authorize the Department of Energy to ensure that investment in research and development in the military application of atomic energy results in the development of civilian applications for, and commercialization of, advanced technology through appropriate transfers of federally owned or originated technology to State and local governments, private industry, and educational and nonprofit institutions.  \n    Part\n    E\n     - \n    Environment, Safety, and Management\n    Authorizes appropriations to DOE for FY 1990 for environmental restoration and management of defense waste and transportation in specified amounts at specified locations. Directs the Secretary of Energy to report to the defense and appropriations committees at the end of each calendar quarter on each major DOE national security program (a program that is either designated by the Secretary as a major DOE national security program or that is estimated by the Secretary to cost more than $500,000,000). Outlines report information requirements, including a description of the program, its purpose, and its schedule and cost. Requires the Secretary to identify to such committees all programs of DOE that are major national security programs. Directs the Secretary to prepare and submit to such committees a five-year budget plan for national security programs of DOE. Directs the Secretary to establish and carry out a program for the supervision, direction, and coordination of all research activities of DOE for the development of technologies useful for the reduction of environmental hazards and contamination resulting from defense waste and the environmental restoration of inactive defense waste disposal sites. Requires the Secretary to carry out such program through a program manager. Requires the Secretary to coordinate such research program with the research activities of the EPA relating to the same matter. Requires the Secretary to report to the Congress on such activities. Directs the President to establish a Blue Ribbon Task Group on Environmental Restoration and Defense Waste Management to examine the procedures used in establishing requirements, providing necessary resources, planning, and implementing plans with respect to defense waste management and environmental restoration at DOE facilities that conduct atomic energy defense activities. Requires various reports from the President and the Task Group with respect to the membership, activities, and recommendations of the Task Group. Directs the Secretary of Energy to establish and implement a management training program for DOE personnel involved in the management of atomic energy defense activities. Amends the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 to authorize the Nuclear Regulatory Commission to: (1) provide for the safe storage, processing, transportation, and disposal of hazardous waste resulting from nuclear materials and weapons production and naval nuclear propulsion programs; and (2) carry out research and development of technologies needed for the negotiation and verification of international agreements on control of special nuclear materials and nuclear weapons.  \n    Title\n    XXXII\n     - \n    Defense Nuclear Facilities Safety Board\n    Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 for the establishment and operation of the Defense Nuclear Facilities Safety Board. Requires a report from the Secretary of Defense to the defense and veterans' committees identifying the number of individuals who participated in radiation-risk activities while serving in some capacity in the armed forces, but who are not covered under provisions of the Atomic Veterans Act.  \n    Title\n    XXXIII\n     - \n    National Defense Stockpile\n    Authorizes the President to make specified changes in quantities of materials to be acquired for the National Defense Stockpile (NDS) as provided under the Strategic and Critical Materials Stock Piling Act. Authorizes the President, during FY 1990 and 1991, to use specified amounts from the National Defense Stockpile Transaction Fund for the purpose of stockpile acquisitions. Authorizes the President, during FY 1990 and 1991, to dispose of specified materials in the NDS that have been determined to be excess to the current requirements of the stockpile.  \n    Title\n    XXXIV\n     - \n    Civil Defense\n    Authorizes appropriations for FY 1990 to carry out the Federal Civil Defense Act of 1950."